Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.527.090

School construction and skill centers building account.

The school construction and skill centers building account is created in the state treasury. Proceeds from the bonds issued under RCW 28A.527.010 shall be deposited in the account. The account shall be used for purposes stated in RCW 28A.527.010. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

[ 2008 c 179 s 210.]